Wyoming, session 2025, HB0045.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 23-1-101(a)(ix) is amended to read:
23-1-101. Definitions of wildlife.
(a) As used in this act:
(ix) "Protected animal" means black-footed
ferret, fisher, lynx, otter, pika or wolverine;
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0045
ENROLLED ACT NO. 15, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
2